Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 17.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201670-1603
Municipal utility;
owned and operated by a village; discontinuance of service; notice; procedure.

No municipal utility owned and operated by a village furnishing
water, natural gas, or electricity at retail in this state shall discontinue
service to any domestic subscriber for nonpayment of any past-due account
unless such utility first gives written notice by mail to any subscriber whose
service is proposed to be terminated at least seven days prior to termination.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 16;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2716;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 369;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 17.